Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-808
Historic structure; legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that:

(1) The preservation of historic structures will enrich life for Nebraska's citizens both today and for future generations;

(2) Many historic structures are owned by the state; and

(3) Efforts should be made by the state to identify, preserve, maintain, and restore such historic structures whenever possible.

Laws 1986, LB 563, § 1.